ru: Тип конструкции укулеле: Полностью из массива дерева; Композит / углеродное волокно; Ламинат; Цельная верхняя дека (задняя дека / обечайка из ламината); Другое
da: Konstruktionstype for ukulele: Massivt træ; Komposit/kulfiber; Laminat; Massivt dæk (lamineret bund/sider); Andet
cs: Typ konstrukce ukulele: Celomasivní dřevo; Kompozit / uhlíkové vlákno; Laminát; Masivní vrchní deska (laminátová zadní deska / luby); Ostatní
hu: Ukulele kialakításának típusa: Teljesen tömörfa; Kompozit/szénszál; Laminált; Tömör fedlap (laminált hát/káva); Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave ukuleleja: Povsem masiven les; Kompozit/ogljikova vlakna; Laminat; Masivna zgornja plošča (laminiran hrbet/stranice); Drugo
zh-CN: 尤克里里结构类型: 全单板; 复合材料/碳纤维; 合板; 面单板（合板背板/侧板）; 其他
ko: 우쿨렐레 구조 유형: 올 솔리드 우드; 합성/탄소 섬유; 라미네이트; 솔리드 탑(라미네이트 측후판); 기타
nb: Konstruksjonstype for ukulele: Heltre; Kompositt/karbonfiber; Laminat; Massivt lokk (laminert bunn/sider); Annet
en: Ukulele construction type: All-solid wood; Composite/carbon fiber; Laminate; Solid top (laminate back/sides); Other
nl: Constructietype ukulele: Volledig massief hout; Composiet/koolstofvezel; Laminaat; Massief bovenblad (laminaat achterkant/zijkanten); Anders
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie ukulele: Celomasívne drevo; Kompozit/uhlíkové vlákno; Laminát; Masívna vrchná doska (laminátová zadná doska/luby); Iné
el: Τύπος κατασκευής γιουκαλίλι: Εξ ολοκλήρου από μασίφ ξύλο; Σύνθετο/ανθρακόνημα; Laminate; Μασίφ καπάκι (laminate πλάτη/πλαϊνά); Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do ukulele: Totalmente em madeira maciça; Compósito/fibra de carbono; Laminado; Tampo maciço (fundo/ilhargas em laminado); Outro
tr: Ukulele yapım tipi: Tamamı masif ahşap; Kompozit/karbon fiber; Laminat; Masif üst (laminat arka/yanlar); Diğer
fr: Type de fabrication de l'ukulélé: Entièrement en bois massif; Composite/fibre de carbone; Stratifié; Table massive (dos/éclisses en stratifié); Autre
fi: Ukulelen rakennetyyppi: Kokopuu; Komposiitti/hiilikuitu; Laminaatti; Kokopuukansi (laminoidut sivut ja pohja); Muu
vi: Kiểu kết cấu của đàn Ukulele: Gỗ nguyên miếng toàn bộ; Composite/sợi carbon; Gỗ ép; Mặt trên gỗ nguyên miếng (mặt sau/hông gỗ ép); Khác
ja: ウクレレ構造タイプ: オール単板; コンポジット/カーボンファイバー; ラミネート; トップ単板 (バック/サイドはラミネート); その他
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างของอูคูเลเล่: ไม้แท้ทั้งตัว; คอมโพสิต/คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; ลามิเนต; ไม้แท้ด้านหน้า (ด้านหลัง/ด้านข้างลามิเนต); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗結構類型: 全單板; 複合材質/碳纖維; 合板; 面單板 (側背合板); 其他
bg-BG: Вид конструкция на укулеле: Изцяло масивно дърво; Композитен материал / въглеродни влакна; Ламинат; Масивен плот (гръб/страни от ламинат); Друг
es: Tipo de construcción del ukelele: Madera maciza; Compuesto/fibra de carbono; Laminado; Tapa maciza (fondo y aros laminados); Otro
ro-RO: Tip de construcție pentru ukulele: Lemn masiv integral; Compozit/fibră de carbon; Laminat; Față din lemn masiv (spate/laterale laminate); Altele
pl: Typ konstrukcji ukulele: W całości z litego drewna; Kompozyt / włókno węglowe; Laminat; Lity top (tył/boki z laminatu); Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do ukulele: Totalmente em madeira maciça; Compósito/fibra de carbono; Laminado; Tampo maciço (fundo/laterais em laminado); Outro
lt-LT: Ukulelės konstrukcijos tipas: Visiškai iš medžio masyvo; Kompozitas / anglies pluoštas; Laminatas; Masyvo viršus (laminato galas / šonai); Kita
it: Tipo di costruzione dell'ukulele: Legno massello; Composito/fibra di carbonio; Laminato; Top massello (fondo/fasce in laminato); Altro
sv: Konstruktionstyp av ukulele: Helt i massivt trä; Komposit/kolfiber; Laminat; Massivt lock (laminerad botten/sidor); Övrigt
de: Bauart der Ukulele: Vollmassiv; Verbundstoff/Carbon; Laminat; Massive Decke (Boden/Zargen aus Laminat); Andere
hr-HR: Konstrukcija ukulelea: Potpuno puno drvo; Kompozit / karbonska vlakna; Laminat; Puna gornja ploča (donja i bočne strane od laminata); Ostalo